ru: Серия гонок на стоковых автомобилях: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (на базе серийных); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Другое
pt-BR: Stock car série de corrida: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (baseado em stock car); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Outro
bg-BG: Серия състезания за серийни автомобили: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (на базата на стокови автомобили); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Друго
th: การแข่งขันรถสต็อกคาร์: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (แบบอิงจากรถทั่วไป); Late Model Stock; Legends; โมดิฟายด์; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 改裝車賽事系列: ARCA Menards 系列賽; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA 超級系列賽; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (以量產車為基礎); Late Model Stock; Legends; 改裝車; NASCAR Craftsman 皮卡系列賽; NASCAR 盃系列賽; NASCAR Xfinity 系列賽; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; 其他
pt-PT: Série de corridas de stock car: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (série); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Outro
ko: 스톡카 레이스 시리즈: ARCA 메나즈 시리즈; ASA 미드웨스트 투어; 반돌레로; CRA 슈퍼 시리즈; IMSA 미쉐린 파일럿 챌린지(스톡 기반); 레이트 모델 스톡; 레전드; 모디파이드; NASCAR 크래프츠먼 트럭 시리즈; NASCAR 컵 시리즈; NASCAR 엑스피니티 시리즈; 프로 레이트 모델; SRX; 스포츠맨; 스트리트 스톡; 슈퍼 레이트 모델; 기타
el: Σειρά αγώνων stock car: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (stock-based); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Άλλο
it: Serie di gare di stock car: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (basata su auto di serie); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Altro
lt-LT: Stock car lenktynių serija: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (gamykliniai); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Kita
ro-RO: Seria de curse de mașini de stoc: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (modele de serie); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Altele
ja: ストックカーレースシリーズ: ARCAメナーズ・シリーズ; ASAミッドウェスト・ツアー; バンドレロ; CRAスーパーシリーズ; IMSAミシュラン・パイロット・チャレンジ (市販車ベース); レイトモデルストック; レジェンド; モディファイド; NASCARクラフツマン・トラック・シリーズ; NASCARカップ・シリーズ; NASCARエクスフィニティ・シリーズ; プロ・レイトモデル; SRX; スポーツマン; ストリートストック; スーパー・レイトモデル; その他
nl: Stock car raceserie: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (stock-based); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Overig
vi: Loạt giải đua xe stock car: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (dựa trên xe nguyên bản); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Khác
nb: Stock car-raceserie: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (stock-basert); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Annet
en: Stock car race series: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (stock-based); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Other
hr-HR: Serija utrka stock automobila: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (stock-based); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Ostalo
tr: Stok otomobil yarış serisi: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (stok bazlı); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Diğer
de: Stockcar-Rennserie: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (seriennah); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Andere
cs: Série závodních sériových vozů: Série ARCA Menards; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; Série CRA Super; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (pro sériová auta); Série Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; Série NASCAR Craftsman Truck; Série NASCAR Cup; Série NASCAR Xfinity; Série Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Série Super Late Model; Jiné
pl: Zawody samochodów seryjnych: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (na bazie seryjnych samochodów); Late Model Stock; Legends; Zmodyfikowane; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Inna
fi: Vakioautojen kilpailusarja: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (vakioautoihin perustuva); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Muu
sl-SI: Dirkalna serija serijskih avtomobilov: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (stock-based); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Drugo
da: Stockcar-løbsserie: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (stock car-baseret); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Andet
zh-CN: 改装车赛事系列: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA 米其林飞行员挑战赛（量产车改装）; Late Model Stock; Legends; 改装车赛; NASCAR 匠人卡车系列赛; NASCAR 杯系列赛; NASCAR Xfinity 系列赛; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; 其他
fr: Série de course de stock-car: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (basé sur stock); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Autre
hu: Versenyautós sorozat: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (gyári alapú); Late Model Stock; Legends; Módosított; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Egyéb
sk-SK: Séria pretekov áut: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (na báze sériových áut); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Iné
sv: Stock car-tävlingsserie: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (stock-baserad); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modified; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Övrigt
es: Serie de carreras de autos de serie: ARCA Menards Series; ASA Midwest Tour; Bandolero; CRA Super Series; IMSA Michelin Pilot Challenge (basado en autos de serie); Late Model Stock; Legends; Modificado; NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series; NASCAR Cup Series; NASCAR Xfinity Series; Pro Late Model; SRX; Sportsman; Street Stock; Super Late Model; Otro